Utah statutes.
76-10-3001.   Fraudulent practices to affect market price.

Every person who willfully makes or publishes any false statement, spreads any false rumor, or employs any other false or fraudulent means or device, with intent to affect the market price of any kind of property, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

